Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1305.02
Credit memo; presumed abandoned; when.

A credit memo that remains unredeemed for more than three years after issuance is presumed abandoned and the amount presumed abandoned is the amount credited, as shown on the memo itself.

Laws 1994, LB 1048, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 173, § 2.